en: Gluten-free oat breads
da: Glutenfrie havrebrød
pt: Pães de aveia sem glúten
sv: Glutenfria havrebröd

en: Frozen gluten-free oat breads
da: Frosne glutenfrie havrebrød
pt: Pães de aveia sem glúten congelados
sv: Frysta glutenfria havrebröd

en: Sliced oat breads
da: Skiveskårne havrebrød
pt: Pães de aveia laminados
sv: Skivade havrelimpor, Skivade havrebröd

en: Frozen sliced oat breads
da: Frosne skiveskårne havrebrød
pt: Pães de aveia laminados congelados
sv: Frysta skivade havrelimpor

en: Sliced gluten-free oat breads
da: Skiveskårne glutenfrie havrebrød
pt: Pães de aveia sem glúten laminados
sv: Skivade glutenfria havrelimpor

en: Frozen sliced gluten-free oat breads
da: Frosne skiveskårne glutenfrie havrebrød
pt: Pães de aveia sem glúten laminados congelados
sv: Frysta skivade glutenfria havrelimpor

en: Rye breads, Wheat rye breads
bg: Ръжен хляб
de: Roggenbrote
es: Panes de centeno, Pan de centeno
fi: ruisleivät
fr: Pains de seigle, Pains au seigle, Pain au seigle, Pains de seigle et de froment, Pains au seigle et au froment
hr: Raženi kruhovi
it: Pane di segale, pane nero
lt: Ruginė duona, Kvietinė ruginė duona, Ruginės duonos
nl: Roggebroden, Roggebrood
ro: Pâine de secară, Pâine cu faină de secară
ru: Ржаной хлеб, хлеб ржаной, чёрный хлеб

en: Pumpernickel
xx: Pumpernickel
nl: Pompernikkel
pl: Pumpernikiel

en: Danish style rye breads
xx: Rugbrød
da: Rugbrød
de: Dänisches Roggenbrot
sv: Rågbröd

en: Rye-and-wheat breads, Rye-and-wheat bread
bg: Ръжeнo-пшеничен хляб
de: Roggen- und Weizenbrote
fi: Ruis-vehnäleivät, Ruisvehnäleipä
fr: Pains de seigle et de blé
hr: Raženi i pšenični kruhovi
lt: Ruginės ir kvietinės duonos, ruginė ir kvietinė duona
nl: Rogge-graanbroden
ru: Хлеб ржано-пшеничный, Ржано-пшеничный хлеб

en: Bran bread, Whole-grain bread
fr: Pain au son

en: Wheat breads
bg: Пшеничен хляб
da: Hvedebrød
de: Weizenbrote
es: Panes de trigo
fi: vehnäleivät
fr: Pains de blé
he: לחמי חיטה
hr: Pšenični kruhovi
it: Pani di grano
lt: Kvietinės duonos, Kvietinė duona
nl: Graanbroden, Graanbrood
pl: Chleb biały, Chleby białe
ro: Pâine cu făină de grâu, Pâine de grâu
ru: Пшеничный хлеб
tr: Buğday ekmeği

en: Wheat flatbreads, wheat tortillas, Wheat tortilla wraps to be filled
de: Weizenfladenbrote, Weizenfladenbrot, Soft Bröd
fi: tortillat, Täytettävät vehnätortillawrapit
fr: Tortillas de blé, pains plats au blé, galettes de blé pour tortillas, wraps de blé, galettes au blé pour tortillas, tortillas au blé, wraps au blé, Tortillas souples à base de blé à garnir
hr: Pšenični somuni
it: Tortilla, Wrap, Piadine
lt: Kvietiniai paplotėliai, kvietinės tortilijos
nl: Graantortillas, Platte graanbroden, Platte graanbrood, Wraps (ongevuld)
sv: Halvtjockkakor, Hällakaka

en: Corn flatbreads, Corn tortilla wraps to be filled
fr: Tortillas de maïs, Tortillas souples à base de maïs à garnir
hr: Kukuruzni somuni
lt: Kukurūzų paplotėliai, Kukurūzų tortilijos
nl: Maïstortillas

en: Frozen corn flatbreads, Frozen corn tortilla wraps
fr: Tortillas de maïs surgelées

en: Darnitsky bread
fr: Pain Darnitsky
hr: Darnitsky kruh
nl: Darnitskiebrood
ru: Хлеб Дарницкий

en: Ukrainian bread
da: Ukrainske brød
fr: Pain ukrainien
hr: Ukrajinski kruh
nl: Oekraïense broden
pt: Pão ucraniano
ru: Хлеб украинский

ru: Хлеб украинский новый
fr: Pain ukrainien nouveau
nl: Nieuwe Oekraïense broden

en: Sliced breads, sandwich breads, Sandwich loaf, sandwich loaves, soft breads
bg: Нарязан хляб
ca: Pa de motlle
da: Skiveskårne brød, Brød i skiver
de: geschnittenes Brot
es: Panes de molde
fi: viipaloidut leivät
fr: Pains de mie, pain de mie
hr: Narezani kruhovi
hu: Szeletelt kenyerek
it: Pancarré
lt: Pjaustytos duonos, sumuštinių duonos, sumuštinių kepalas, sumuštinių kepalai, minkšta duona
nl: Gesneden broden
pl: Chleb krojony
pt: Pães de forma
ru: Хлеб нарезанный, Хлеб в нарезке
sv: Skivade bröd
tr: Dilim ekmek

en: Sliced breads without crust, English bread without crust, Sandwich loaf without crust
da: Skiveskårne brød uden skorpe
de: Brot ohne Kruste
es: Pan inglés sin corteza, Pan de molde sin corteza
fr: Pains de mie sans croûte
hr: Narezani kruhovi bez korice
it: Pane inglese senza crosta
lt: Supjaustyto duonos be plutos
nl: Korsteloze broden